Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.085

Duties—Generally.

The activities of a mortgage broker affect the public interest, and require that all actions of mortgage brokers, designated brokers, loan originators, and other persons subject to this chapter be actuated by good faith, abstain from deception, and practice honesty and equity in all matters related to their profession. The duty of preserving the integrity of the mortgage broker business rests upon the mortgage broker, designated broker, loan originator, and other persons subject to this chapter.

[ 2008 c 108 s 20.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 108: See RCW 19.144.005.